Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
JURISDICTION

Note

Part applies to guardianship and protective proceedings begun
on or after September 1, 2014. L 2012, c 236, §2.

[§551G-11] Definitions; significant
factors. (a) For purposes of this part:

"Emergency" means a circumstance that
likely will result in substantial harm to a respondent's health, safety, or
welfare, and for which the appointment of a guardian is necessary because no
other person has authority and is willing to act on the respondent's behalf.

"Home state" means the state in which
the respondent was physically present, including any period of temporary
absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of a
petition for a protective order or the appointment of a guardian; or if none, the
state in which the respondent was physically present, including any period of
temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months ending within the six
months prior to the filing of the petition.

"Significant-connection state" means
a state, other than the home state, with which a respondent has a significant
connection other than mere physical presence and in which substantial evidence
concerning the respondent is available.

(b) In determining under sections 551G-13 and 551G-21(e)
whether a respondent has a significant connection with a particular state, the
court shall consider:

(1) The location of the respondent's family and other
persons required to be notified of the guardianship or protective proceeding;

(2) The length of time the respondent at any time was
physically present in the state and the duration of any absence;

(3) The location of the respondent's property; and

(4) The extent to which the respondent has ties to
the state such as voting registration, state or local tax return filing,
vehicle registration, driver's license, social relationship, and receipt of
services. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next